Hawaii, session 2026, GM1104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Ira Barnes Dutton
was born on April 27, 1843, in Stowe, Vermont, and spent his
formative years in Janesville, Wisconsin. In September of 1861,
during the beginning of the Civil War, Ira Barnes Dutton
enlisted in the Union Army as part of Company B of the
thirteenth Wisconsin infantry. Ira Barnes Dutton was
subsequently discharged in 1866 due to a downsizing of the
military after the Civil War. Following the Civil War, Ira
Barnes Dutton suffered from a failed marriage, alcoholism,
probable post-traumatic stress disorder, and other personal
problems, leading him on a journey to seek atonement through
Catholicism. During this time, Ira Barnes Dutton was baptized
and adopted the name of his favorite saint, Joseph.
The legislature recognizes that, upon learning about the
work of Father Damien on Molokai, Joseph Dutton made his way to
Hawaii. Arriving at Kalaupapa in July of 1886, Joseph Dutton
assisted Father Damien, who had been diagnosed with leprosy.
l S ■ B m LRB l g 2 u 6- l 0 l 1 n 23 ll . l d ll o l c l x lll 1

Page 2 S.B. NO. ^2.56
Joseph Dutton quickly became an expert in caring for patients
while working alongside Father Damien, who affectionately called
Joseph Dutton "Brother". After Father Damien's death three
years later in 1889, Joseph Dutton managed the Baldwin Home for
Boys for leprosy victims and dedicated the remainder of his life
to the residents of Kalaupapa until becoming ill. Joseph Dutton
was then transferred to St. Francis Hospital in Honolulu, where
he passed away on March 26, 1931.
The legislature further finds that in 1929, the Hawaii
territorial house of representatives acknowledged the work of
Brother Joseph Dutton and passed House Resolution No. 7, which
read, in part, "this House desires to put on record its
appreciation of the great and inspiring service and influence
for good, for the splendid and effective service he has rendered
in their behalf and for the work done during the past 40 years
by Brother Joseph Dutton in the Settlement of Molokai in his
ministration to the afflicted in Kalawao and Kalaupapa; and that
the thanks of the House of representatives be extended to him in
his memorial".
The legislature notes that the State officially recognizes
Saint Damien de Veuster Day every May 10; Saint Marianne Cope
SB LRB 26-0123.docx
■iHlIllllillH

Page 3
S.B. NO.
Day every January 23; and Kalaupapa Month every January. The
legislature believes that similar recognition should be accorded
to Brother Joseph Dutton.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to honor the hard
work and dedication of Brother Joseph Dutton in helping
residents of Kalaupapa by establishing April 27 of each year as
Brother Joseph Dutton Day.
SECTION 2. Chapter 8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to
read as follows:
"§8- Brottier Josegh putton paj^ April 27 of each year
shall be known and designated as "Brother Joseph Dutton Day".
This day is not and shall not be construed to be a state
holiday.”
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

SB LRB 26-0123.docx 3
■niiBiiinifliiiiiiii

S.B. NO. ""
APPROVED this 23rd day of April , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 2256
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: March 10, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
OF THE STATE OF HAW API
APR 8 2026
Date:
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the House
of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of
2026.
Speaker, House of Representatives
Clerk, House of Representatives
2962